Washington statutes.
RCW 35.102.060

Multiple taxation—Credit system.

(1) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall provide for a system of credits to avoid multiple taxation as follows:

(a) Persons who engage in business activities that are within the purview of more than one classification of the tax shall be taxable under each applicable classification.

(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, if imposition of the tax would place an undue burden upon interstate commerce or violate constitutional requirements, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit only to the extent necessary to preserve the validity of the tax.

(c) Persons taxable under the retailing or wholesaling classification with respect to selling products in a city shall be allowed a credit against those taxes for any eligible gross receipts taxes paid by the person (i) with respect to the manufacturing of the products sold in the city, and (ii) with respect to the extracting of the products, or the ingredients used in the products, sold in the city. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising with respect to the sale of those products.

(d) Persons taxable under the manufacturing classification with respect to manufacturing products in a city shall be allowed a credit against that tax for any eligible gross receipts tax paid by the person with respect to extracting the ingredients of the products manufactured in the city and with respect to manufacturing the products other than in the city. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising with respect to the manufacturing of those products.

(e) Persons taxable under the retailing or wholesaling classification with respect to selling products in a city shall be allowed a credit against those taxes for any eligible gross receipts taxes paid by the person with respect to the printing, or the printing and publishing, of the products sold within the city. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising with respect to the sale of those products.

(2) The model ordinance shall be drafted to address the issue of multiple taxation for those tax classifications that are in addition to those enumerated in subsection (1)(c) through (e) of this section. The objective of any such provisions shall be to eliminate multiple taxation of the same income by two or more cities.

[ 2003 c 79 s 6.]